Washington statutes.
RCW 39.42.120

Excess earnings account—Payments to United States treasury.

The excess earnings account is created in the state treasury. From the revenue funds from which principal and interest payments on bonds are provided, the state treasurer shall periodically transfer to the excess earnings account such amounts as are owed to the federal government under section 148 of the federal internal revenue code. Pursuant to legislative appropriation from the excess earnings account, the state treasurer shall periodically remit to the United States treasury any amounts owed to the federal government under section 148 of the federal internal revenue code.

[ 1988 c 92 s 1.]